Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.150

Operating without license—Injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence or use of any other remedy, the department, may, in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney general who shall represent the department in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent the operation or maintenance of an assisted living facility without a license under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 10 s 10; 1957 c 253 s 15.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.